Illinois, session 104th, HB2461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-208.8 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-208.8)7    Sec. 11-208.8. Automated speed enforcement systems in 8safety zones.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Automated speed enforcement system" means a photographic 11device, radar device, laser device, or other electrical or 12mechanical device or devices installed or utilized in a safety 13zone and designed to record the speed of a vehicle and obtain a 14clear photograph or other recorded image of the vehicle and 15the vehicle's registration plate or digital registration plate 16while the driver is violating Article VI of Chapter 11 of this 17Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance.18    An automated speed enforcement system is a system, located 19in a safety zone which is under the jurisdiction of a 20municipality, that produces a recorded image of a motor 21vehicle's violation of a provision of this Code or a local 22ordinance and is designed to obtain a clear recorded image of 23the vehicle and the vehicle's license plate. The recorded   HB2461 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1image must also display the time, date, and location of the 2violation.3    "Owner" means the person or entity to whom the vehicle is 4registered.5    "Recorded image" means images recorded by an automated 6speed enforcement system on:7        (1) 2 or more photographs;8        (2) 2 or more microphotographs;9        (3) 2 or more electronic images; or10        (4) a video recording showing the motor vehicle and, 11    on at least one image or portion of the recording, clearly 12    identifying the registration plate or digital registration 13    plate number of the motor vehicle.14    "Safety zone" means an area that is within one-eighth of a 15mile from the nearest property line of any public or private 16elementary or secondary school, or from the nearest property 17line of any facility, area, or land owned by a school district 18that is used for educational purposes approved by the Illinois 19State Board of Education, not including school district 20headquarters or administrative buildings. A safety zone also 21includes an area that is within one-eighth of a mile from the 22nearest property line of any facility, area, or land owned by a 23park district used for recreational purposes. However, if any 24portion of a roadway is within either one-eighth mile radius, 25the safety zone also shall include the roadway extended to the 26furthest portion of the next furthest intersection. The term   HB2461 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1"safety zone" does not include any portion of the roadway 2known as Lake Shore Drive or any controlled access highway 3with 8 or more lanes of traffic. 4    (a-5) The automated speed enforcement system shall be 5operational and violations shall be recorded only at the 6following times: 7        (i) if the safety zone is based upon the property line 8    of any facility, area, or land owned by a school district, 9    only on school days and no earlier than 6 a.m. and no later 10    than 8:30 p.m. if the school day is during the period of 11    Monday through Thursday, or 9 p.m. if the school day is a 12    Friday; and13        (ii) if the safety zone is based upon the property 14    line of any facility, area, or land owned by a park 15    district, no earlier than one hour prior to the time that 16    the facility, area, or land is open to the public or other 17    patrons, and no later than one hour after the facility, 18    area, or land is closed to the public or other patrons. 19    (b) A municipality that produces a recorded image of a 20motor vehicle's violation of a provision of this Code or a 21local ordinance must make the recorded images of a violation 22accessible to the alleged violator by providing the alleged 23violator with a website address, accessible through the 24Internet. 25    (c) Notwithstanding any penalties for any other violations 26of this Code, the owner of a motor vehicle used in a traffic   HB2461 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1violation recorded by an automated speed enforcement system 2shall be subject to the following penalties: 3        (1) if the recorded speed is no less than 6 miles per 4    hour and no more than 10 miles per hour over the legal 5    speed limit, a civil penalty not exceeding $50, plus an 6    additional penalty of not more than $50 for failure to pay 7    the original penalty in a timely manner; or8        (2) if the recorded speed is more than 10 miles per 9    hour over the legal speed limit, a civil penalty not 10    exceeding $100, plus an additional penalty of not more 11    than $100 for failure to pay the original penalty in a 12    timely manner.13    A penalty may not be imposed under this Section if the 14driver of the motor vehicle received a Uniform Traffic 15Citation from a police officer for a speeding violation 16occurring within one-eighth of a mile and 15 minutes of the 17violation that was recorded by the system. A violation for 18which a civil penalty is imposed under this Section is not a 19violation of a traffic regulation governing the movement of 20vehicles and may not be recorded on the driving record of the 21owner of the vehicle. A law enforcement officer is not 22required to be present or to witness the violation. No penalty 23may be imposed under this Section if the recorded speed of a 24vehicle is 5 miles per hour or less over the legal speed limit. 25The municipality may send, in the same manner that notices are 26sent under this Section, a speed violation warning notice   HB2461 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1where the violation involves a speed of 5 miles per hour or 2less above the legal speed limit.3    (d) The net proceeds that a municipality receives from 4civil penalties imposed under an automated speed enforcement 5system, after deducting all non-personnel and personnel costs 6associated with the operation and maintenance of such system, 7shall be expended or obligated by the municipality for the 8following purposes:9        (i) public safety initiatives to ensure safe passage 10    around schools, and to provide police protection and 11    surveillance around schools and parks, including but not 12    limited to: (1) personnel costs; and (2) non-personnel 13    costs such as construction and maintenance of public 14    safety infrastructure and equipment;15        (ii) initiatives to improve pedestrian and traffic 16    safety;17        (iii) construction and maintenance of infrastructure 18    within the municipality, including but not limited to 19    roads and bridges; and20        (iv) after school programs. 21    (e) For each violation of a provision of this Code or a 22local ordinance recorded by an automated speed enforcement 23system, the municipality having jurisdiction shall issue a 24written notice of the violation to the registered owner of the 25vehicle as the alleged violator. The notice shall be delivered 26to the registered owner of the vehicle, by mail, within 30 days   HB2461 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1after the Secretary of State notifies the municipality of the 2identity of the owner of the vehicle, but in no event later 3than 90 days after the violation.4    (f) The notice required under subsection (e) of this 5Section shall include:6        (1) the name and address of the registered owner of 7    the vehicle;8        (2) the registration number of the motor vehicle 9    involved in the violation;10        (3) the violation charged;11        (4) the date, time, and location where the violation 12    occurred;13        (5) a copy of the recorded image or images;14        (6) the amount of the civil penalty imposed and the 15    date by which the civil penalty should be paid;16        (7) a statement that recorded images are evidence of a 17    violation of a speed restriction;18        (8) a warning that failure to pay the civil penalty or 19    to contest liability in a timely manner is an admission of 20    liability;21        (9) a statement that the person may elect to proceed 22    by:23            (A) paying the fine; or24            (B) challenging the charge in court, by mail, or 25        by administrative hearing; and26        (10) a website address, accessible through the   HB2461 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1    Internet, where the person may view the recorded images of 2    the violation.3    (g) (Blank).4    (h) Based on inspection of recorded images produced by an 5automated speed enforcement system, a notice alleging that the 6violation occurred shall be evidence of the facts contained in 7the notice and admissible in any proceeding alleging a 8violation under this Section.9    (i) Recorded images made by an automated speed enforcement 10system are confidential and shall be made available only to 11the alleged violator and governmental and law enforcement 12agencies for purposes of adjudicating a violation of this 13Section, for statistical purposes, or for other governmental 14purposes. Any recorded image evidencing a violation of this 15Section, however, may be admissible in any proceeding 16resulting from the issuance of the citation. 17    (j) The court or hearing officer may consider in defense 18of a violation:19        (1) that the motor vehicle or registration plates or 20    digital registration plates of the motor vehicle were 21    stolen before the violation occurred and not under the 22    control or in the possession of the owner or lessee at the 23    time of the violation;24        (1.5) that the motor vehicle was hijacked before the 25    violation occurred and not under the control of or in the 26    possession of the owner or lessee at the time of the   HB2461 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1    violation;2        (2) that the driver of the motor vehicle received a 3    Uniform Traffic Citation from a police officer for a 4    speeding violation occurring within one-eighth of a mile 5    and 15 minutes of the violation that was recorded by the 6    system; and7        (3) any other evidence or issues provided by municipal 8    ordinance.9    (k) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle was hijacked or 10the motor vehicle or registration plates or digital 11registration plates were stolen before the violation occurred 12and were not under the control or possession of the owner or 13lessee at the time of the violation, the owner or lessee must 14submit proof that a report concerning the motor vehicle or 15registration plates was filed with a law enforcement agency in 16a timely manner.17    (l) A roadway equipped with an automated speed enforcement 18system shall be posted with a sign conforming to the national 19Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices that is visible to 20approaching traffic stating that vehicle speeds are being 21photo-enforced and indicating the speed limit. The 22municipality shall install such additional signage as it 23determines is necessary to give reasonable notice to drivers 24as to where automated speed enforcement systems are installed.25    (m) A roadway where a new automated speed enforcement 26system is installed shall be posted with signs providing 30   HB2461 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1days notice of the use of a new automated speed enforcement 2system prior to the issuance of any citations through the 3automated speed enforcement system.4    (n) The compensation paid for an automated speed 5enforcement system must be based on the value of the equipment 6or the services provided and may not be based on the number of 7traffic citations issued or the revenue generated by the 8system.9    (n-1) No member of the General Assembly and no officer or 10employee of a municipality or county shall knowingly accept 11employment or receive compensation or fees for services from a 12vendor that provides automated speed enforcement system 13equipment or services to municipalities or counties. No former 14member of the General Assembly shall, within a period of 2 15years immediately after the termination of service as a member 16of the General Assembly, knowingly accept employment or 17receive compensation or fees for services from a vendor that 18provides automated speed enforcement system equipment or 19services to municipalities or counties. No former officer or 20employee of a municipality or county shall, within a period of 212 years immediately after the termination of municipal or 22county employment, knowingly accept employment or receive 23compensation or fees for services from a vendor that provides 24automated speed enforcement system equipment or services to 25municipalities or counties. 26    (o) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of   HB2461 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1this Section, a municipality that operates an automated speed 2enforcement system shall set aside 3% of the net proceeds from 3each system that generates more than $500,000 in revenue for 4the school or park in the safety zone in which the automated 5speed enforcement system is located. The set aside proceeds 6may be allocated for any purpose designated by the school or 7park. 8    A home rule unit may not regulate the amount and use of the 9net proceeds from speed enforcement cameras in a manner less 10restrictive than the regulation of such by the State under 11this subsection. This subsection is a limitation of subsection 12(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on 13the concurrent powers and functions exercised by both the home 14rule unit and the State. (Blank).15    (p) No person who is the lessor of a motor vehicle pursuant 16to a written lease agreement shall be liable for an automated 17speed or traffic law enforcement system violation involving 18such motor vehicle during the period of the lease; provided 19that upon the request of the appropriate authority received 20within 120 days after the violation occurred, the lessor 21provides within 60 days after such receipt the name and 22address of the lessee. The drivers license number of a lessee 23may be subsequently individually requested by the appropriate 24authority if needed for enforcement of this Section.25    Upon the provision of information by the lessor pursuant 26to this subsection, the municipality may issue the violation   HB2461 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1to the lessee of the vehicle in the same manner as it would 2issue a violation to a registered owner of a vehicle pursuant 3to this Section, and the lessee may be held liable for the 4violation. 5    (q) A municipality using an automated speed enforcement 6system must provide notice to drivers by publishing the 7locations of all safety zones where system equipment is 8installed on the website of the municipality.9    (r) A municipality operating an automated speed 10enforcement system shall conduct a statistical analysis to 11assess the safety impact of the system following installation 12of the system and every 2 years thereafter. A municipality 13operating an automated speed enforcement system before the 14effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 15Assembly shall conduct a statistical analysis to assess the 16safety impact of the system by no later than one year after the 17effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 18Assembly and every 2 years thereafter. Each statistical 19analysis shall be based upon the best available crash, 20traffic, and other data, and shall cover a period of time 21before and after installation of the system sufficient to 22provide a statistically valid comparison of safety impact. 23Each statistical analysis shall be consistent with 24professional judgment and acceptable industry practice. Each 25statistical analysis also shall be consistent with the data 26required for valid comparisons of before and after conditions   HB2461 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1and shall be conducted within a reasonable period following 2the installation of the automated traffic law enforcement 3system. Each statistical analysis required by this subsection 4shall be made available to the public and shall be published on 5the website of the municipality.6    (s) This Section applies only to municipalities with a 7population of 1,000,000 or more inhabitants.8    (t) If a county or municipality selects a new vendor for 9its automated speed enforcement system and must, as a 10consequence, apply for a permit, approval, or other 11authorization from the Department for reinstallation of one or 12more malfunctioning components of that system and if, at the 13time of the application for the permit, approval, or other 14authorization, the new vendor operates an automated speed 15enforcement system for any other county or municipality in the 16State, then the Department shall approve or deny the county or 17municipality's application for the permit, approval, or other 18authorization within 90 days after its receipt. 19    (u) The Department may revoke any permit, approval, or 20other authorization granted to a county or municipality for 21the placement, installation, or operation of an automated 22speed enforcement system if any official or employee who 23serves that county or municipality is charged with bribery, 24official misconduct, or a similar crime related to the 25placement, installation, or operation of the automated speed 26enforcement system in the county or municipality.  HB2461 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09391 LNS 19450 b1    The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 2implement and administer this subsection. The rules adopted by 3the Department shall describe the revocation process, shall 4ensure that notice of the revocation is provided, and shall 5provide an opportunity to appeal the revocation. Any county or 6municipality that has a permit, approval, or other 7authorization revoked under this subsection may not reapply 8for such a permit, approval, or other authorization for a 9period of 1 year after the revocation. 10(Source: P.A. 102-905, eff. 1-1-23; 103-364, eff. 7-28-23.)